Utah statutes.
58-63-103.   Use of dedicated credits for licensing, education, and enforcement.

(1)  The director may, with the concurrence of the board, use the monies collected under Section 58-63-503 for the following purposes:

(a)  educating and training licensees under this chapter;

(b)  educating and training the general public or other interested persons in matters concerning the laws that govern the practices licensed under this chapter; and

(c)  enforcing this chapter by:

(i)  investigating unprofessional or unlawful conduct; and

(ii)  providing legal representation to the division when it takes legal action against a person charged with unprofessional or unlawful conduct.

(2)  The monies collected under Section 58-63-503 and used for the purposes listed in Subsection (1) are nonlapsing.

